Utah statutes.
15-7-11.   Registration records -- Public inspection -- Location.
(1) Records, with regard to the ownership of or security interests in
registered public obligations, are not subject to inspection or copying under
any law of this state relating to the right of the public to inspect or copy
public records.
(2)  Registration records of the issuer may be maintained at such locations
within or without this state as the issuer determines.
